South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5546.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Notwithstanding Section 59-1-425 or any other provision of law, the board of trustees of York County School District 4 may waive the requirement that school days missed by students at Flint Hill Elementary School on March 5, 2026, and March 6, 2026, due to a chemical leak on property adjacent to the school be made up. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----